lexc-files/inflections/noun/noun-infl_a-i-u.txt
!-------------------------------------|---------------------------------------|---------------------------------------|
[All][Sg][4SgPoss]:^munnun    PostInflI; [All][Pl][4SgPoss]:^munnun    PostInflI; [All][Du][4SgPoss]:^gmunnun   PostInflI;
[All][Sg][4PlPoss]:^meggnun   PostInflI; [All][Pl][4PlPoss]:^meggnun   PostInflI; [All][Du][4PlPoss]:^gmeggnun  PostInflI;
[All][Sg][4DuPoss]:^megtenun  PostInflI; [All][Pl][4DuPoss]:^megtenun  PostInflI; [All][Du][4DuPoss]:^gmegtenun PostInflI;
!-------------------------------------|---------------------------------------|---------------------------------------|


!---------------------------------------|
!          PERLATIVE (vialis)           |
!---------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------|------------------------------------------|
[Per][Sg]:^kun                  PostInflI; [Per][Pl]:^tgun                 PostInflI; [Per][Du]:^gnegun                PostInflI;
!---------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------|------------------------------------------|
[Per][Sg][1SgPoss]:^mkun        PostInflI; [Per][Pl][1SgPoss]:^mkun        PostInflI; [Per][Du][1SgPoss]:^gemkun       PostInflI;
[Per][Sg][1PlPoss]:^mteggun     PostInflI; [Per][Pl][1PlPoss]:^mteggun     PostInflI; [Per][Du][1PlPoss]:^gemteggun    PostInflI;
[Per][Sg][1DuPoss]:^mtegnegun   PostInflI; [Per][Pl][1DuPoss]:^mtegnegun   PostInflI; [Per][Du][1DuPoss]:^gemtegnegun  PostInflI;
!---------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------|------------------------------------------|
[Per][Sg][2SgPoss]:^gpegun      PostInflI; [Per][Pl][2SgPoss]:^gpegun      PostInflI; [Per][Du][2SgPoss]:^gpegun       PostInflI;
[Per][Sg][2PlPoss]:^gpesigun    PostInflI; [Per][Pl][2PlPoss]:^gpesigun    PostInflI; [Per][Du][2PlPoss]:^gpesigun     PostInflI;
[Per][Sg][2DuPoss]:^gpetegnegun PostInflI; [Per][Pl][2DuPoss]:^gpetegnegun PostInflI; [Per][Du][2DuPoss]:^gpetegnegun  PostInflI;
!---------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------|------------------------------------------|
[Per][Sg][3SgPoss]:^ngakun      PostInflI; [Per][Sg][3SgPoss]:^ngakun      PostInflI; [Per][Du][3SgPoss]:^gkenkun      PostInflI;
[Per][Sg][3PlPoss]:^ngitgun     PostInflI; [Per][Sg][3PlPoss]:^ngitgun     PostInflI; [Per][Du][3PlPoss]:^ngitgun      PostInflI;
[Per][Sg][3DuPoss]:^gkenkun     PostInflI; [Per][Pl][3DuPoss]:^ngakun      PostInflI; [Per][Du][3PlPoss]:^ngitgun      PostInflI;
!---------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------|------------------------------------------|
[Per][Sg][4SgPoss]:^mikun       PostInflI; [Per][Pl][4SgPoss]:^mikun       PostInflI; [Per][Du][4SgPoss]:^gmikun       PostInflI;
[Per][Sg][4PlPoss]:^megteggun   PostInflI; [Per][Pl][4PlPoss]:^megteggun   PostInflI; [Per][Du][4PlPoss]:^gmegteggun   PostInflI;
[Per][Sg][4DuPoss]:^megtegnegun PostInflI; [Per][Pl][4DuPoss]:^megtegnegun PostInflI; [Per][Du][4DuPoss]:^gmegtegnegun PostInflI;
!---------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------|------------------------------------------|


!--------------------------------------|
!          EQUATIVE (equalis)          |
!--------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------|
[Equ][Sg]:^tun                 PostInflI; [Equ][Pl]:^stun                PostInflI; [Equ][Du]:^gestun               PostInflI;
!--------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------|
[Equ][Sg][1SgPoss]:^mtun       PostInflI; [Equ][Pl][1SgPoss]:^mtun       PostInflI; [Equ][Du][1SgPoss]:^gemtun      PostInflI;
[Equ][Sg][1PlPoss]:^mtestun    PostInflI; [Equ][Pl][1PlPoss]:^mtestun    PostInflI; [Equ][Du][1PlPoss]:^gemtestun   PostInflI;
[Equ][Sg][1DuPoss]:^mtegestun  PostInflI; [Equ][Pl][1DuPoss]:^mtegestun  PostInflI; [Equ][Du][1DuPoss]:^gemtegestun PostInflI;
!--------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------|
[Equ][Sg][2SgPoss]:^gpetun     PostInflI; [Equ][Pl][2SgPoss]:^gpetun     PostInflI; [Equ][Du][2SgPoss]:^gpetun      PostInflI;
[Equ][Sg][2PlPoss]:^gpesistun  PostInflI; [Equ][Pl][2PlPoss]:^gpesistun  PostInflI; [Equ][Du][2PlPoss]:^gpesistun   PostInflI;
[Equ][Sg][2DuPoss]:^gpetegetun PostInflI; [Equ][Pl][2DuPoss]:^gpetegetun PostInflI; [Equ][Du][2DuPoss]:^gpetegetun  PostInflI;
!--------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------|
[Equ][Sg][3SgPoss]:^ngatun     PostInflI; [Equ][Sg][3SgPoss]:^ngatun     PostInflI; [Equ][Du][3SgPoss]:^gketun      PostInflI;
[Equ][Sg][3PlPoss]:^ngitun     PostInflI; [Equ][Sg][3PlPoss]:^ngitun     PostInflI; [Equ][Du][3PlPoss]:^ngitun      PostInflI;
[Equ][Sg][3DuPoss]:^gketun     PostInflI; [Equ][Pl][3DuPoss]:^ngitun     PostInflI; [Equ][Du][3PlPoss]:^ngitun      PostInflI;
!--------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------|
[Equ][Sg][4SgPoss]:^mitun      PostInflI; [Equ][Pl][4SgPoss]:^mitun      PostInflI; [Equ][Du][4SgPoss]:^gmitun      PostInflI;
[Equ][Sg][4PlPoss]:^megestun   PostInflI; [Equ][Pl][4PlPoss]:^megestun   PostInflI; [Equ][Du][4PlPoss]:^gmegestun   PostInflI;
[Equ][Sg][4DuPoss]:^megestun   PostInflI; [Equ][Pl][4DuPoss]:^megestun   PostInflI; [Equ][Du][4DuPoss]:^gmegestun   PostInflI;
!--------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|-----------------------------------------|


!--------------------------------------|
! Obsolete Verb Root -ete              |
!   [Jacobson (2001) p.78]             |
!--------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
[Loc][Sg]:^m                VerbRootEte; [Loc][Pl]:^n                VerbRootEte; [Loc][Du]:^gn               VerbRootEte;
!--------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
[Loc][Sg][1SgPoss]:^mn      VerbRootEte; [Loc][Pl][1SgPoss]:^mn      VerbRootEte; [Loc][Du][1SgPoss]:^gemn    VerbRootEte;
[Loc][Sg][1PlPoss]:^mnn     VerbRootEte; [Loc][Pl][1PlPoss]:^mnn     VerbRootEte; [Loc][Du][1PlPoss]:^gemnn   VerbRootEte;
[Loc][Sg][1DuPoss]:^mtegn   VerbRootEte; [Loc][Pl][1DuPoss]:^mtegn   VerbRootEte; [Loc][Du][1DuPoss]:^gemtegn VerbRootEte;
!--------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
[Loc][Sg][2SgPoss]:^gpen    VerbRootEte; [Loc][Pl][2SgPoss]:^gpen    VerbRootEte; [Loc][Du][2SgPoss]:^gpen    VerbRootEte;
[Loc][Sg][2SgPoss]:^gpegn   VerbRootEte; [Loc][Pl][2SgPoss]:^gpegn   VerbRootEte; [Loc][Du][2SgPoss]:^gpegn   VerbRootEte;
[Loc][Sg][2PlPoss]:^gpesin  VerbRootEte; [Loc][Pl][2PlPoss]:^gpesin  VerbRootEte; [Loc][Du][2PlPoss]:^gpesin  VerbRootEte;
[Loc][Sg][2DuPoss]:^gpetegn VerbRootEte; [Loc][Pl][2DuPoss]:^gpetegn VerbRootEte; [Loc][Du][2DuPoss]:^gpetegn VerbRootEte;
!--------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
[Loc][Sg][3SgPoss]:^ngan    VerbRootEte; [Loc][Pl][3SgPoss]:^ngan    VerbRootEte; [Loc][Du][3SgPoss]:^gken    VerbRootEte;
[Loc][Sg][3PlPoss]:^ngitn   VerbRootEte; [Loc][Pl][3PlPoss]:^ngitn   VerbRootEte; [Loc][Du][3PlPoss]:^ngitn   VerbRootEte;
[Loc][Sg][3DuPoss]:^gken    VerbRootEte; [Loc][Pl][3DuPoss]:^ngitn   VerbRootEte; [Loc][Du][3DuPoss]:^ngitn   VerbRootEte;
!--------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
[Loc][Sg][4SgPoss]:^min     VerbRootEte; [Loc][Pl][4SgPoss]:^min     VerbRootEte; [Loc][Du][4SgPoss]:^gmin    VerbRootEte;
[Loc][Sg][4PlPoss]:^meggn   VerbRootEte; [Loc][Pl][4PlPoss]:^meggn   VerbRootEte; [Loc][Du][4PlPoss]:^gmeggn  VerbRootEte;
[Loc][Sg][4DuPoss]:^megn    VerbRootEte; [Loc][Pl][4DuPoss]:^megn    VerbRootEte; [Loc][Du][4DuPoss]:^gmegn   VerbRootEte;
[Loc][Sg][4DuPoss]:^megten  VerbRootEte; [Loc][Pl][4DuPoss]:^megten  VerbRootEte; [Loc][Du][4DuPoss]:^gmegten VerbRootEte;
!--------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|----------------------------------------|
